Maryland, session 2025, SB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That, notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, a Class
B–D–7 license issued for a premises on the 5700 block of Falls Road shall be considered
unexpired until the end of July 1, 2026, for the purpose of completing a transfer of
ownership and renewal at the same location.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of July
31, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 1 –